California statutes. Streets and Highways Code
It shall be the duty of the board of supervisors of each county within the district to annually cause to be levied upon the lands only, exclusive of improvements, within the county liable therefor the amounts reported to it by the treasurer of such district, which amounts shall be clearly sufficient to pay the principal and interest coming due or past due in such year upon any funding bonds of the district together with a sufficient amount to cover delinquencies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 19. Emergency Bonds [25490. - 25498.]

25490.

If a court of competent jurisdiction determines that any contract, proceeding, step or action taken, levy made, or any bonds issued under this part are void, invalid, or unenforceable, or if such court shall for any reason enjoin the issuance or payment of any bonds proposed to be issued or paid under the provisions of this part the court shall also determine whether or not any improvement has been made or services rendered by any person in behalf of and for the benefit of the district under any invalid contract or proceeding or under any contract pursuant to which invalid bonds were issued or proposed to be issued, and if so what part, if any, is of a kind that the district might have lawfully authorized.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25491.

If the court finds that any such improvement has been made, or services rendered, or necessary rights of way or property acquired, the court shall order the board of directors of the district to take the steps authorized in this chapter for the issuance of bonds to cover the cost of the same. The board of directors of the district may also utilize the provisions of this chapter without order of court when it is necessary to correct any invalid act or proceeding which has resulted in a benefit to the district and which it might have lawfully authorized.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25492.

It is the purpose of this chapter to make the costs and expenses of all improvements made, or services rendered, and all necessary acquisitions of property or rights of way obtained, under an attempted compliance with and exercise of the powers and rights conferred by this part, payable by the property benefited or to be benefited thereby, by the issuance of bonds as provided in this chapter for the purpose of defraying the costs and expenses thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25493.

The board of directors shall cause a report on the bond issue proposed under this chapter to be made and filed by the district engineer or some other competent person appointed for that purpose. The report shall contain:

(a) A statement in general terms of what the proposed bond issue is to cover, together with the total amount of the same. The total amount shall not exceed the original charge made against the district for the items included, plus a reasonable interest thereon not to exceed 6 per cent per annum.

(b) A description of the lands benefited by the items for which the bonds are proposed to be issued.

(c) A description of the zones, if any, into which such district is to be divided, and a statement of the amounts (not exceeding the percentages of the total sum established for the several counties within the district under Section 25154 hereof) proposed to be made chargeable against each of such zones.

(d) A description of the bonds to be issued for the total amount set forth in the report.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25494.

The report shall be filed with the secretary of the board of directors, who shall thereupon fix a time and place for hearing the report and shall give notice thereof. Notice of the hearing shall be published at least twice in one or more newspapers of general circulation selected by the secretary, from those which are published and circulated within the boundaries of the land within the district which will be benefited by the items for which the bonds are to be issued. The last publication of notice of hearing shall be not less than 20 days prior to the date set for the hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25495.

At the time of the hearing, or at any time to which the hearing may be continued, any person interested may appear and be heard upon any of the matters set forth in the report. The board of directors may confirm, revise, correct or modify the report in accordance with the facts found.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25496.

At the conclusion of the hearing the board shall adopt a resolution declaring its findings upon the report. When adopted the resolution shall be final and conclusive upon all persons and in all proceedings or actions as to all matters so found. If no changes are made in the report, the board shall declare that the report is confirmed and that declaration shall constitute the findings of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25497.

The bonds issued under this chapter shall in terms and form conform substantially to the provisions contained in Chapter 18 relating to funding bonds and shall be payable in not more than five annual installments. The annual amounts required for the payment of principal and interest on any bonds issued under this chapter shall be levied and collected in the same manner as the annual amounts required for the payment of principal and interest on funding bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25498.

Upon the adoption of the resolution by the board, the treasurer of the district shall immediately cause bonds to be issued in the amount and manner provided in the resolution. The bonds shall be dated as of the date of the resolution and shall be issued and delivered to the persons entitled thereto. No action or proceeding shall be commenced or maintained after 60 days from the date of their issuance to cancel or set aside the bonds or prevent the payment thereof, or the levy, collection or enforcement of any taxes, assessment taxes or other charges or levies for such payment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 20. Dissolution [25520. - 25521.]

25520.

Upon the completion or other termination of the projects for which the district is organized and upon the payment and retirement of all outstanding bonds and obligations of the district, the district shall be wound up and dissolved. The secretary shall or any member of the board of directors may call a meeting for the dissolution of the district. If a meeting for dissolution is not called the board of supervisors of any county within the district may demand the calling of such meeting and the dissolution of the district. Notice of such meeting shall be given to each member county and contributing political subdivision and public corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1141.)
-------------------------------------------

25521.

Any property or money belonging to the district at the time of dissolution shall be distributed by the board of directors to the State and the several counties, cities, other political subdivisions and public corporations in the proportions in which they have respectively contributed to the expense and operation of the district. Upon such distribution the board of directors shall adopt a resolution certifying such distribution and the dissolution of the district. Upon the filing of a copy of said resolution with the Secretary of State, the district shall be finally terminated and dissolved.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1141.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2. BOULEVARD DISTRICTS [26000. - 26260.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [26000. - 26004.]

26000.

“District,” means a boulevard district unless the context clearly indicates otherwise.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 285.)
-------------------------------------------

26001.

“Commission,” means the boulevard commission unless the context clearly indicates otherwise.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 285.)
-------------------------------------------

26002.

“Boulevard,” means a highway not less than 30 and not more than 100 feet in width and upon, along, and over the portion or portions of which where the same is less than 60 feet in width no railroad, electric road, or street railroad shall, except upon a permit granted therefor by the board or body in control of such boulevard evidenced by an order entered in its minutes, be constructed or operated; and any easements granted or condemned for the building of said boulevard shall be so granted or condemned. This section does not prevent or limit the use of vehicles across the boulevard.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 285.)
-------------------------------------------

26003.

Except as otherwise provided in this part, all elections conducted in the district shall be conducted as nearly as practicable in accordance with the general election laws of the State. The provisions of such election laws relating to the form of ballots and the making of nominations and the selection or appointment of officers of election, shall not apply to district elections.

No irregularity or informality in conducting any district election which does not substantially affect adversely the legal rights of any person who is entitled to vote at that election shall invalidate or affect the election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 285.)
-------------------------------------------

26004.

At each election held pursuant to this part, every registered voter residing in the district as proposed or established, who would be entitled on the date of the election to vote in the district at a general election, is entitled to vote.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 285.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Formation Petition [26020. - 26026.]

26020.

A boulevard district may be formed from any portion of a county not already contained in a boulevard district. When formed, the district shall be known and designated as _______ boulevard district (using the name of the district) of ______ county (using the name of the county in which the district is located).

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 285.)
-------------------------------------------

26021.

A petition for the formation of a district may be presented to the board of supervisors of the county in which the district is proposed to be formed. The petition shall be signed by not less than 10 freeholders, owning land within the proposed district and shall contain:

(a) The name of the proposed district.

(b) The boundaries of the proposed district, and an estimate of the number of inhabitants residing within those boundaries.

(c) An estimate of the number of acres contained within the boundaries of the proposed district and the assessed value of the land and of the improvements.

(d) A request that an election be called within the proposed district for the purpose of determining whether or not a district shall be formed for the purpose of constructing and maintaining a boulevard.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 285.)
-------------------------------------------

26022.

At the time of the filing of the petition for the formation of the district the petitioners shall file a bond with the board of supervisors for not more than three hundred dollars ($300), approved by the board, upon the condition that the petitioners will pay the expense and cost of the election in an amount not exceeding the amount of the bond if the proposition to organize the district is defeated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 517, Sec. 380.)
-------------------------------------------

26023.

The petition shall be presented at a regular meeting of the board of supervisors which shall thereupon fix a time, not less than 20 nor more than 60 days after the date of presentation, for hearing the petition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 285.)
-------------------------------------------

26024.

The board of supervisors shall publish a notice of the fact that the petition has been filed and refer to it on file with the clerk of the board of supervisors for further particulars. The notice shall give the time and place at which the petition shall be heard, and direct all parties interested to appear at that time and place, and show cause, if any they have, why the petition should not be granted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 285.)
-------------------------------------------

26025.

The notice shall be published at least once a week for two consecutive weeks in a newspaper published and circulated in the proposed district. If no newspaper is published in the proposed district, the notice shall be published in a newspaper published and circulated at the county seat of the county in which the proposed district is located.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 285.)
-------------------------------------------

26026.

Upon the day specified, the board of supervisors shall hear the petition and any objections thereto. The hearing may be adjourned from time to time, for not more than 60 days in all.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 285.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Establishing District Boundaries [26040. - 26043.]

26040.

In fixing the final boundaries of the district the board of supervisors may exclude any lands which it finds have been improperly included.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 285.)
-------------------------------------------

26041.

The board of supervisors may include any lands adjacent to those described in the petition, either on:

(a) Petition of the owners of the adjacent lands; or

(b) Upon notice of its intention to include the adjacent lands within the district.

If the lands are included upon notice, the notice shall be published in the same manner and for the same time as the original notice of hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 285.)
-------------------------------------------

26042.

The notice of intention to include adjacent lands shall refer to the petition for the formation of the district on file with the board of supervisors, shall describe the adjacent territory intended to be included within the proposed boundaries of the proposed district and direct all persons interested to appear at a specified time and place and show cause if any there be why the described lands should not be included within the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 285.)
-------------------------------------------

26043.

Upon the petition and evidence produced at the hearings the board of supervisors shall determine and fix the boundaries of the district and shall, by order entered in its minutes, define and establish such boundaries.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 285.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Calling and Conducting Elections [26060. - 26066.]

26060.

Within 30 days after the establishment of the boundaries of the district, the board of supervisors shall, by order, call an election to be held in the proposed district for the purpose of determining whether or not the district shall be formed.

The order shall:

(a) Fix the day of the election, which shall be within 60 days after the date of the order.

(b) Show the boundaries of the proposed district.

(c) State that at the election one member of the commission will be voted for. 

This order shall be entered in the minutes of the board and shall be conclusive evidence of:

(a) The due presentation of a proper petition.

(b) The fact that each of the petitioners was, at the time of the signing and presentation of the petition, a freeholder owning land within the proposed district.

(c) The fact that all other steps preliminary to the making of the order, including the hearing of the petition and establishment of the boundaries of the district, have been properly taken.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 285.)
-------------------------------------------

26061.

Notice of the election shall be given by posting a copy of the order for three successive weeks prior to the election, in three public places within the proposed district, and by publication of a copy of the order at least once a week for three successive weeks prior to the election in a newspaper published in the proposed district, if there be one, and if not, in a newspaper published at the county seat of the county in which the district is located.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 285.)
-------------------------------------------

26062.

At least 15 days prior to the election, the board of supervisors shall select one or more polling places within the proposed district, and make all suitable arrangements for the holding of the election. It shall select and appoint from among the qualified electors of the proposed district one inspector and two judges of election in each polling place, who shall constitute the officers of the election and the election board. If no officers are so appointed or if any officer appointed does not attend at the opening of the polls on the morning of the election, the electors present may appoint substitutes to fill the election board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 285.)
-------------------------------------------

26063.

At the election there shall be elected one member of the commission, whose term of office shall be for four years and until the election, or appointment, and qualification of his successor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 285.)
-------------------------------------------

26064.

The ballot shall contain the words “Shall the boulevard district be formed?” To the right of or below these words, the words “Yes” and “No” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets. The ballot shall also make provision for voting for one member of the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 303, Sec. 33.   (AB 1512)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

26065.

The officers of election shall make a return of the election to the board of supervisors, which shall canvass the returns as provided by law. If a majority of the votes cast at the election are in favor of creating the district the board of supervisors shall make and enter in its minutes an order declaring that the district of the name, and with the boundaries theretofore established (setting forth the boundaries), has been duly created, and shall declare the person receiving the highest number of votes for member of the commission, duly elected.

The order shall be conclusive evidence of the fact and of the regularity of all prior proceedings provided for by this part, and of the existence of, and the validity of the creation of, the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 285.)
-------------------------------------------

26066.

If a majority of the votes cast are against the creation of the district, the board of supervisors shall by order entered in its minutes so declare, and no other proceeding shall be taken in relation thereto until the expiration of one year from the date of the presentation to the board of supervisors of the petition pursuant to which the election was called.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 285.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Selection of the Boulevard Commission [26080. - 26088.]

26080.

The commission shall consist of the chairman of the board of supervisors and the county surveyor, or the county engineer, as the case may be, of the county in which the district is situated, who shall be ex officio members, and a third member elected pursuant to Chapter 4 of this part. The elected member shall have been a bona fide resident and freeholder within the boundaries of the district for at least one year prior to his election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 285.)
-------------------------------------------

26081.

Any vacancy in the membership of the commission shall be filled by appointment for the unexpired term by the board of supervisors from among the bona fide resident freeholders within the district who shall have been resident freeholders for at least one year prior to their appointment. No member of the board of supervisors, except the chairman thereof, shall be eligible to hold office on the commission or to hold any position in connection therewith.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 285.)
-------------------------------------------

26082.

Upon the receipt of a petition in writing, signed by at least 25 percent in number of the registered voters residing within the district, the California Transportation Commission shall declare the position on the commission held by the county surveyor or county engineer, as the case may be, vacant, and nominate and appoint a person to fill the vacancy who is a civil engineer and who, in the opinion of the California Transportation Commission, is qualified to serve on the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 121.)
-------------------------------------------

26083.

The member appointed by the California Transportation Commission shall hold office for the term of four years from and after his appointment, and until the appointment and qualification of his successor. All appointments to fill any vacancy in the position of that member either during or at the expiration of his term of office shall be made by the California Transportation Commission upon the receipt of written notice from the commission of the vacancy. No petition shall be necessary to authorize the appointment to fill the vacancy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 122.)
-------------------------------------------

26084.

Each member of the commission shall give a bond in the sum of five thousand dollars ($5,000) which has been approved by a judge of the superior court of the county in which the district is located, to the district for the faithful performance of his duties. The members of the commission shall receive no compensation whatever either for general or special services for or on behalf of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 285.)
-------------------------------------------

26085.

An election shall be held on the first Monday after the first Tuesday in March in the fourth year after the formation of the district, and in every fourth year thereafter, for the purpose of electing a member to succeed the elected member of the commission whose term shall expire during that year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 285.)
-------------------------------------------

26086.

At least 20 days before the day of the election the commission shall post a notice of the election in three public places in the district. The notice shall specify the time and place of election, the hours during which the polls will be kept open, and the officer to be elected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 285.)
-------------------------------------------

26087.

The commission shall select one or more polling places within the district; shall appoint one inspector and two judges of election in each polling place, and make all necessary and proper arrangements for holding the election. The election officers shall constitute the election board. If no election officers are appointed by the commission, or if any of those appointed are not present at the time of the opening of the polls, the electors present may appoint substitutes to fill the election board who shall conduct the election as if they had been appointd by the commission and were present.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 285.)
-------------------------------------------

26088.

The election board shall publicly canvass the votes immediately after the closing of the polls, and shall make return of the election within 24 hours thereafter to the board of supervisors. The board of supervisors at its first meeting after receiving the returns shall canvass the same and shall make, sign and deliver a certificate of election to the person elected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 285.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Powers and Duties of the Commission [26110. - 26115.]

26110.

The commission shall be the governing body of the district, and shall exercise all of the powers which are vested in the district. At its first meeting or as soon thereafter as may be practicable, the commission shall choose one of its members as president, and another of its members as secretary. All written documents shall be signed in the name of the district by the president of the commission, and countersigned by the secretary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 285.)
-------------------------------------------

26111.

The commission shall hold all meetings in the district at an appointed place, at such times as may be convenient. If either the president or the secretary are absent or unable to act, the commission shall, by order entered upon its minutes, choose from its members a president pro tempore, or secretary pro tempore, as the case may be.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 285.)
-------------------------------------------

26112.

A majority of the members of the commission shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business, and every decision of the majority made when duly assembled, is valid as an act of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 285.)
-------------------------------------------

26113.

The district may use a common seal, alterable at the pleasure of the commission and may:

(a) Sue and be sued in its own name.

(b) Lay out, establish, construct, acquire and maintain boulevards within the district, and for this purpose acquire by purchase, gift, devise, condemnation proceedings or otherwise, and pay for and hold, real and personal property and rights of way within the district.

Any easement procured for the building of a boulevard, whether procured by grant or condemnation, shall permit the use of the boulevard by a railroad, electric road, or street railroad pursuant to this part.

(c) Make and accept all contracts, deeds, releases and documents of any kind which shall be necessary or proper to the exercise of any of the powers of the district.

(d) Direct the payment of all lawful claims and demands against the district. 

(e) Issue bonds as hereinafter provided, and provide for their payment.

(f) When directed to do so by a vote of the people of the district, have sufficient taxes levied for the construction, maintenance or repair of district boulevards, and the payment of all indebtedness and running expenses of the district. 

(g) Employ all necessary engineers, surveyors, agents and workmen to do the work on or in connection with the boulevards in the district.

(h) Do any and all things necessary or proper for the complete exercise of its powers and the accomplishment of the purposes for which it was formed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 285.)
-------------------------------------------

26114.

For the purposes of this part the district may take over, control, operate, and use in whole or in part any county road or public highway and may construct any boulevard in whole or in part, over, along, or upon all or any part of any county road or public highway. District funds may be expended in the improvement of such road or highway to conform to the width and general character of the balance of the boulevard.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 285.)
-------------------------------------------

26115.

At its option, the commission may make application to the Department of Transportation for the exercise by the department of any powers, duties, or authority which the department may have with respect to the ownership, construction, maintenance, or improvement of any boulevard pursuant to this part, including the preparation of plans, specifications, and estimates and the handling and expenditure of district moneys for such construction, maintenance, or improvement.

Any such application to the Department of Transportation shall be made in accordance with the provisions of law defining the powers, duties, or privileges of the department in relation to such matters, and, upon the granting of any such application by the department, the commission shall have full power to carry out the terms of the application on its part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 123.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Preliminary Plans and Surveys [26130. - 26131.]

26130.

Before the construction of any boulevard and before the calling of any election for the issuance of bonds, the commission shall employ one or more engineers who shall make all necessary surveys, prepare maps showing the location, cross-section and profile of the proposed boulevard. The engineer shall also prepare specifications for the construction of the boulevard and estimates of the cost of construction and of acquiring rights of way.

These surveys, maps, specifications and estimates shall, upon approval by the commission, be formally adopted by order entered upon its minutes and filed with its secretary and when so adopted shall constitute the plan of the district for the proposed boulevard. The commission may, at its option, direct the county surveyor, or county engineer, as the case may be, to do any of the engineering work.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 285.)
-------------------------------------------

26131.

The expense of making the preliminary surveys may be allowed by the board of supervisors out of the county general fund or the general county road fund upon claims regularly presented and allowed in the manner provided by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 285.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Approval of Construction Plans [26160. - 26166.]

26160.

At any time after the adoption of a plan for a boulevard or the letting of a contract for the construction of the whole or any portion of any boulevard, the commission may by order entered in its minutes call an election for the purpose of determining whether bonds shall be issued for the acquisition of rights of way for, and the construction of, such boulevard, or for the payment of such contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 285.)
-------------------------------------------

26161.

The order shall fix the day of the election, shall specify the amount of the bond issue, and shall state in general terms that the money raised from the sale of the bonds shall be used for the acquisition of rights of way for, and the construction of, boulevards in the district.

If the election is called for the payment of a contract already entered into by the commission, the order shall state the terms of the contract in such manner as will advise the electors of its contents. Any money raised by means of a bond issue which remains on hand after the acquisition of rights of way and the construction have been completed, shall be expended in the betterment and maintenance of the boulevard.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 285.)
-------------------------------------------

26162.

Notice of the election shall be given in the manner and for the time provided for in Section 26061.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 285.)
-------------------------------------------

26163.

At any time prior to the day fixed for the election the commission shall select one or more polling places within the district, and appoint from among the qualified electors within the district, one inspector, and two judges for each polling place who shall constitute the officers of the election and the election board, and shall make all other necessary and proper arrangements for holding the election. To the right of or below each bond proposition on the ballot, the words “Yes” and “No” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 303, Sec. 34.   (AB 1512)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

26164.

After the vote has been counted and the result announced by the election officers the ballots shall be sealed up and delivered to the secretary of the commission with the election returns. The commission shall, at its next meeting, canvass the returns and enter the result upon its minutes. This entry in the minutes is conclusive evidence of the fact and regularity of all prior proceedings required by this part and of the facts stated in the entry.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 285.)
-------------------------------------------

26165.

If, at the election, two-thirds of the votes cast are in favor of the issuance of bonds, the commission is authorized to issue and sell the bonds as proposed in the order calling the election. If the result of the election is against the issuance of bonds no other election upon the same question shall be called or held for one year after such election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 285.)
-------------------------------------------

26166.

A boulevard may be constructed with money raised by taxation instead of a bond issue if authorized by a majority of the votes cast at an election called for the purpose of determining if the boulevard shall be so constructed.

Elections to authorize the construction of boulevards with money raised by taxation shall be called and held in the same manner as is provided for bond elections.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 285.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10. The Bond Issue [26180. - 26184.]

26180.

All bonds shall be issued in such denominations as the commission may determine, except that they shall not be less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 285.)
-------------------------------------------

26181.

All bonds shall be payable in lawful money of the United States at the office of the county treasurer of the county in which the district is situated, and shall bear interest at a rate not to exceed 8 percent per annum which shall be payable semiannually. Not less than one-thirtieth part of the total issue of bonds shall be payable each year, commencing not more than five years after the date of the bond issue.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 130.)
-------------------------------------------

26182.

The bonds shall be signed by the president and countersigned by the secretary of the commission. They shall be numbered consecutively, in the order of their maturity, and shall have coupons for interest attached, attested by the facsimile signature of the secretary of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 285.)
-------------------------------------------

26183.

The bonds may be sold by the commission in such manner and in such quantities as it may determine. However no bond may be sold for less than its face value.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 285.)
-------------------------------------------

26184.

The proceeds of the sale of bonds shall be deposited with the county treasurer and shall be placed by him in a fund in the county treasury to be called the boulevard fund of ____ boulevard district (naming it). The money in the fund shall be used for the purposes indicated in the order calling the election at which the issuance of the bonds was authorized.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 285.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 11. Levy and Collection of Taxes [26200. - 26203.]

26200.

At or before the first meeting of the board of supervisors in September of each year, the commission shall furnish the board of supervisors and the auditor of the county in which the district is situated, an estimate in writing of the amount of money needed for the purposes of the district for the ensuing fiscal year. The amount shall be sufficient to pay:

(a) The interest on all outstanding bonds of the district which will become due during the ensuing fiscal year.

(b) The principal of all outstanding bonds of the district which will mature during the ensuing fiscal year.

(c) The estimated cost of repairs and maintenance of the boulevard, and the running expenses of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 285.)
-------------------------------------------

26201.

Annually, at the time of levying county taxes, the board of supervisors shall levy a tax to be known as the “_______ (name of district) boulevard district tax,” sufficient to raise the amount estimated by the commission to be necessary for the purposes of the district for the ensuing fiscal year. The board of supervisors shall determine the rate of the tax by deducting 15 per cent for anticipated delinquencies from the total assessed value of the real property within the district, as it appears on the assessment roll of the county, and dividing the sum required to be raised, by the remainder of the total assessed value.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 285.)
-------------------------------------------

26202.

The tax so levied shall be computed and entered on the assessment roll by the county auditor, and if the board of supervisors fails to levy the tax the auditor shall do so. The tax shall be collected at the same time and in the same manner as county taxes, and when collected shall be paid into the county treasury for the use of the district.

The provisions of law prescibing the manner of levying and collecting county taxes and the duties of the several county officers with respect to taxation are, so far as they are not in conflict with this part, applicable to taxation under this part. Such officers shall be liable upon their several official bonds for the faithful discharge of the duties imposed upon them by this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 285.)
-------------------------------------------

26203.

All money raised by taxation which is authorized by this part shall belong to the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 285.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 12. County Contributions [26220. - 26220.]

26220.

The board of supervisors shall set apart and turn over to the commission out of the general fund of the county 25 per cent of the cost of acquiring the rights of way for, and construction of, the boulevard and 25 per cent of the cost of maintaining and repairing the boulevard. All money so set apart and turned over to the commission shall be used exclusively for the purposes for which it was so set apart and turned over.

The board of supervisors shall set apart and use for road work in the district all moneys raised in the district by the county for road purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 285.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 13. District Funds [26221. - 26222.]

26221.

The treasury of the county in which the district is situated shall be the depository for the funds of the district. The county treasurer shall receive and receipt for the funds of the district, and shall place all such funds to the credit of the district. He shall be responsible upon his official bond for their safekeeping and proper disbursement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 285.)
-------------------------------------------

26222.

The following funds are hereby established in the county treasury to which the money belonging to the district, and raised by taxation shall be apportioned by the treasurer:

(a) Bond fund.

(b) Construction and maintenance fund.

(c) District expense fund.
